Utah statutes.
23-25-9.   Entry into compact and withdrawal.

(1)  This compact shall become effective at the time it is adopted in substantially similar form by two or more states.

(2) (a)  Entry into the compact shall be made by resolution of ratification by the authorized officials of the applying state and submitted to the chairman of the board.

(b)  The resolution shall substantially be in the form and content as provided in the compact manual and shall include the following:

(i)  a citation of the authority from which the state is empowered to become a party to this compact;

(ii)  an agreement of compliance with the terms and provisions of this compact; and

(iii)  an agreement that compact entry is with all states participating in the compact and with all additional states legally becoming a party to the compact.

(c)  The effective date of entry shall be specified by the applying state but shall not be less than 60 days after notice has been given:

(i)  by the chairman of the board of the compact administrators; or

(ii)  by the secretary of the board to each participating state that the resolution from the applying state has been received.

(3)  A participating state may withdraw from participation in this compact by official written notice to each participating state, but withdrawal shall not become effective until 90 days after the notice of withdrawal is given.  No withdrawal of any state shall affect the validity of this compact as to the remaining participating states.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 1992 General Session

